Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.010

Claims—Statement of residence required—Time for filing—Verification.

Claims for damages sounding in tort against any code city shall be presented and filed within the time, in the manner and by the person prescribed in RCW 4.96.020.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.010.]